Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6512
Qualified business, defined.

Qualified business means any business if the majority of the business activities conducted throughout Nebraska by such business meet the requirements for a qualified location as defined in subsection (1) or (2) of section 77-6818. For purposes of this section, the majority of business activities conducted shall be determined based on the number of equivalent employees working in the respective business activities.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 55.